Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.446

Filing required for conversion—Effective date.

(1) After a plan of conversion is approved, the converting organization must make one of the following filings to complete the conversion:

(a) A converting limited liability company must deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of conversion, which must include:

(i) A statement that the limited liability company has been converted into another organization;

(ii) The name and form of the converted organization and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(iii) The date the conversion is effective under the governing statute of the converted organization;

(iv) A statement that the conversion was approved as required by this chapter;

(v) A statement that the conversion was approved as required by the governing statute of the converted organization; and

(vi) If the converted organization is a foreign organization not registered to transact business in this state, the street and mailing address of the converted organization's principal office for the purposes of service of process under RCW 23.95.450; or

(b) A converting organization that is not a limited liability company must deliver to the secretary of state for filing a certificate of formation, together with articles of conversion, which must include:

(i) A statement that the limited liability company was converted from another organization;

(ii) The name and form of the converting organization and the jurisdiction of its governing statute; and

(iii) A statement that the conversion was approved in a manner that complied with the converting organization's governing statute.

(2) The effective time of a conversion is either:

(a) If the converted organization is a limited liability company, when the certificate of formation takes effect; or

(b) If the converted organization is not a limited liability company, as provided by the governing statute of the converted organization.

(3) If the certificate of formation filed pursuant to this section does not specify a delayed effective date, it becomes effective upon filing as provided in RCW 23.95.210. The certificate of formation may specify a delayed effective time and date in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7130; 2015 c 188 s 86.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.